Connecticut, session 2026, SB00407.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 14-96q of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A permit is required for the use of colored or flashing lights on all
motor vehicles or equipment specified in this section except: (1) Motor
vehicles not registered in this state used for transporting or escorting
any vehicle or load, or combinations thereof, which is either oversize or
overweight, or both, when operating under a permit issued by the
Commissioner of Transportation pursuant to section 14-270; or (2)
motor vehicles or equipment that are (A) equipped with lights in
accordance with this section, (B) owned or leased by the federal
government, the state of Connecticut, or any other state, commonwealth
or local municipality, and (C) registered to such governmental entity.
When used in this section, the term "flashing" shall be considered to
include the term "revolving".
(b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, or such other person
specifically identified in this section, may issue permits for the use of

Substitute Senate Bill No. 407
colored or flashing lights on vehicles in accordance with this section, at
the commissioner's or such person's discretion. Any person, firm or
corporation other than the state or any metropolitan district, town, city
or borough shall pay an annual permit fee of twenty dollars to the
commissioner for each such vehicle. Such fee shall apply only to permits
issued by the commissioner.
(c) A flashing blue light or lights may be used on a motor vehicle
operated by an active member of a volunteer fire department or
company or an active member of an organized civil preparedness
auxiliary fire company who has been issued a permit by the chief
executive officer of such department or company to use a flashing blue
light or lights while on the way to or at the scene of a fire or other
emergency requiring such member's services. Such permit shall be on a
form provided by the commissioner and may be revoked by such chief
executive officer or successor. The chief executive officer of each
volunteer fire department or company or organized civil preparedness
auxiliary fire company shall keep on file, on forms provided by the
commissioner, the names and addresses of members who have been
authorized to use a flashing blue light or lights as provided in this
subsection. Such listing shall also designate the registration number of
the motor vehicle on which authorized a flashing blue light or lights are
to be used.
(d) A flashing green or blue light or lights may be used on a motor
vehicle operated by an active member of a volunteer ambulance
association or company who has been issued a permit by the chief
executive officer of such association or company to use such a light or
lights, while on the way to or at the scene of an emergency requiring
such member's services. Such permit shall be on a form provided by the
commissioner and may be revoked by such chief executive officer or
successor. The chief executive officer of each volunteer ambulance
association or company shall keep on file, on forms provided by the
Public Act No. 26-147 2 of 5

Substitute Senate Bill No. 407
commissioner, the names and addresses of members who have been
authorized to use a flashing green or blue light or lights as provided in
this subsection. Such listing shall also designate the registration number
of the motor vehicle on which the authorized flashing green or blue light
or lights are to be used.
(e) The commissioner may issue a permit for a flashing red light or
lights which may be used on a motor vehicle or equipment (1) used by
paid fire chiefs and their deputies and assistants, up to a total of five
individuals per department, (2) used by volunteer fire chiefs and their
deputies and assistants, up to a total of five individuals per department,
(3) used by members of the fire police on a stationary vehicle as a
warning signal during traffic directing operations at the scene of a fire
or emergency, (4) used by chief executive officers of emergency medical
service organizations, as defined in section 19a-175, the first or second
deputies, or if there are no deputies, the first or second assistants, of such
an organization that is a municipal or volunteer or licensed
organization, (5) used by local fire marshals, (6) used by directors of
emergency management, or (7) used by a constable, appointed pursuant
to an ordinance authorized by section 9-185 or elected pursuant to
section 9-200, on a stationary vehicle as a warning signal during traffic
directing operations.
(f) The commissioner may issue a permit for a yellow or amber light
or lights, including a flashing yellow or amber light or lights, which may
be used on motor vehicles or equipment that are (1) specified in
subsection (e) of this section, (2) maintenance vehicles, or (3) vehicles
transporting or escorting any vehicle or load or combinations thereof,
which is or are either oversize or overweight, or both, and being
operated or traveling under a permit issued by the Commissioner of
Transportation pursuant to section 14-270. A yellow or amber light or
lights, including a flashing yellow or amber light or lights, may be used
without obtaining a permit from the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles
Public Act No. 26-147 3 of 5

Substitute Senate Bill No. 407
on wreckers registered pursuant to section 14-66, on vehicles of carriers
in rural mail delivery service or on vehicles operated by construction
inspectors employed by the state of Connecticut, authorized by the
Commissioner of Transportation, used during the performance of
inspections on behalf of the state. The Commissioner of Transportation
shall maintain a list of such authorized construction inspectors,
including the name and address of each inspector and the registration
number for each vehicle on which the light or lights are to be used.
(g) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may issue a permit for a
white light or lights, including a flashing white light or lights, which
may be used on a motor vehicle or equipment as specified in subdivision
(1), (2), (4), (5) or (6) of subsection (e) of this section. A vehicle being
operated by a member of a volunteer fire department or company or a
volunteer emergency medical technician may use flashing white head
lamps, provided such member or emergency medical technician is on
the way to the scene of a fire or medical emergency and has received
written authorization from the chief law enforcement officer of the
municipality to use such head lamps. Such head lamps shall only be
used within the municipality granting such authorization or from a
personal residence or place of employment, if located in an adjoining
municipality. Such authorization may be revoked for use of such head
lamps in violation of this subdivision. For the purposes of this
subsection, the term "flashing white lights" shall not include the
simultaneous flashing of head lamps.
(h) The commissioner may issue a permit for emergency vehicles, as
defined in subsection (a) of section 14-283, and organ transport vehicles
to use a blue, red, yellow [,] or white light or lights, including a flashing
light or lights or any combination thereof, except as provided in
subsection (k) of this section. For the purposes of this subsection, "organ
transport vehicle" means any vehicle operated by an employee of a
procurement organization, as defined in section 19a-289a, while
Public Act No. 26-147 4 of 5

Substitute Senate Bill No. 407
transporting parts, as defined in said section.
(i) The commissioner may issue a permit for ambulances, as defined
in section 19a-175, which may, in addition to the flashing light or lights
allowed in subsection (h) of this section, use flashing lights of other
colors specified by federal requirements for the manufacture of an
ambulance. If the commissioner issues a permit for any ambulance, such
permit shall be issued at the time of registration and upon each renewal
of such registration.
(j) A green, yellow or amber light or lights, including a flashing green,
yellow or amber light or lights or any combination thereof, may be used
on a maintenance vehicle owned and operated by the Department of
Transportation.
(k) No person, other than a police officer or inspector of the
Department of Motor Vehicles operating a state or local police vehicle,
shall operate a motor vehicle displaying a steady blue or steady red
illuminated light or both steady blue and steady red illuminated lights
that are visible externally from the front of the vehicle.
(l) Use of colored and flashing lights except as authorized by this
section shall be an infraction.
(m) Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer upon the
operator of any vehicle the privileges granted to the operator of an
emergency vehicle under section 14-283.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-147 5 of 5